Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.660

Presidential electors—Selection at convention.

A minor political party or independent candidate convention nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president of the United States shall, not later than ten days after the adjournment of the convention, submit a list of presidential electors to the office of the secretary of state. The list shall contain the names and the mailing addresses of the persons selected and shall be verified by the presiding officer of the convention.

[ 2004 c 271 s 156. Formerly RCW 29A.20.181.]